Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 5.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-27,196.01
Changes to sections; when operative; credits; applicability of act.

(1) The changes made in sections 77-27,188, 77-27,188.02, 77-27,190, 77-27,192, 77-27,193, and 77-27,194 by Laws 1997, LB 886, shall become operative for all credits earned in tax years beginning, or deemed to begin, on and after January 1, 1998. For all credits earned in tax years beginning, or deemed to begin, prior to January 1, 1998, the provisions of the Employment Expansion and Investment Incentive Act as they existed immediately prior to such date shall apply.

(2) The changes made in sections 77-27,187.01 and 77-27,188 by Laws 1999, LB 539, shall become operative for all credits earned in tax years beginning, or deemed to begin, on and after January 1, 1999. For all credits earned in tax years beginning, or deemed to begin, prior to January 1, 1999, the provisions of the Employment Expansion and Investment Incentive Act as they existed immediately prior to such date shall apply.

(3) The changes made in sections 77-27,188, 77-27,188.02, and 77-27,192 by Laws 2001, LB 169, shall become operative for all credits earned in tax years beginning, or deemed to begin, on and after January 1, 2001. For all credits earned in tax years beginning, or deemed to begin, prior to January 1, 2001, the provisions of the Employment Expansion and Investment Incentive Act as they existed immediately prior to such date shall apply.

(4) The changes made in sections 77-27,187.01 and 77-27,187.02 by Laws 2008, LB 895, become operative for applications filed on and after April 18, 2008. The changes made in section 77-27,188 by Laws 2008, LB 895, become operative for applications filed on and after July 1, 2009.

Laws 1997, LB 886, § 10;

Laws 1999, LB 539, § 3;

Laws 2001, LB 169, § 5;

Laws 2008, LB895, § 5.
April 18, 2008The Employment Expansion and Investment Incentive Act was renamed the Nebraska Advantage Rural Development Act, see section 77-27,187.